Hawaii, session 2025, GM1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that detention and
retention ponds are meant to hold stormwater. However, while
detention and retention ponds help manage stormwater and control
flooding, mitigating risk for these systems is critical in
minimizing threats to public health and safety. Hawaii's high
drowning rate, the second worst in the nation for residents and
the highest for visitors, necessitates joining other
jurisdictions across the United States in developing retention
and detention pond safety programs. The urgency is made even
greater by climate change, which has resulted in more frequent
and intense rainfall, causing an increased use of retention
ponds, which are designed to hold water year-round, and
detention ponds, which remain dry until a major rain.
The legislature further finds that the Hawai‘i Water Safety
Plan, which was published by the Hawaii Water Safety Coalition
in 2025, provides several recommendations to reduce drowning by
2025-2762 SB1221 CDl SMA-l.docx
■■■lllMIIIIUlWMIIIil

Page 2
S.B. NO.
■ • h.D. 3
CD. 1
improving safety regarding detention and retention ponds in the
State.
The purpose of this Act is to ensure the health, safety,
and welfare of the citizens of the State by requiring the
counties to:
(1) Regulate the permitting, construction, and maintenance
of retention and detention ponds, including
establishing safety standards for retention and
detention ponds; and
(2) Conduct a survey of existing retention and detention
ponds Statewide and submit a report to the
legislature.
This Act also recognizes Charlotte "Sharkey" Schaefers, the
five-year-old girl who drowned at a Pearl City naval housing
complex while trying to save the life of her childhood friend.
SECTION 2. Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
read as follows:
"§46- Retention ponds and detention ponds; safety
requirements. (a) This section shall be known and may be cited
as "Sharkey's Law".
2025-2762 SB1221 CDl SMA-l.docx
luiiwinmiiiiHiiiiiiiii

Page 3 S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, each county shall adopt
ordinances for the regulation of all retention ponds and
detention ponds located within the county's jurisdiction. The
ordinances adopted pursuant to this subsection shall include but
not be limited to;
(1) Establishing a permitting process for the construction
of new retention ponds or detention ponds; and
Establishing safety requirements, which shall include
but not be limited to;
(A) Fencing that is at least four feet high that
fully encloses the retention pond or detention
pond and allows access through one or more
secured, locked gates;
(B) Safety signage indicating "No Swimming" and
wa^iiujT3 of sudden wa;t^r leyel^chan2e^
(C) Installation of life buoys at entry points for
emergency rescue;
(D) Proper maintenance of ground cover surrounding
the retention pond or detention pond, including
mowing, weed control, and debris removal; and
2025-2762 SB1221 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 4 1221
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(E) Submission of maintenance plans by property
owners or managers to ensure ongoing safety and
compliance.
(c) This section shall not apply to retention ponds and
detention ponds built on golf courses, hotels, resort
properties, or other secured recreational areas; provided that
the entities who own, control, or manage such properties shall
provide the counties with proof of sufficient security measures
for its retention ponds and detention ponds.
(d) For the purposes of this section:
"Detention pond" means an area that is designed to:
(1) Hold stormwater until the effects of percolation,
evapotranspiration, or controlled release return the
area to its normally dry state; and
(2) Dissipate inflowing stormwater within seventy-two
hours to accommodate a new volume of water.
"Retention pond" means a permanent or semi-permanent
aquatic system that acts as a trap where pollutants picked up by
the initial surge of stormwater settle out before leaving the
system."
2025-2762 SB1221 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO. ^2
■ • h.D. 3
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. Each county shall conduct a survey of all
existing retention and detention ponds located within its
jurisdiction and submit a report of its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular session of 2026.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2762 SB1221 CDl SMA-l.docx 5

S.B. NO.
i

b
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 3rcl day of July .2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 1221, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
126

SB No. 1221, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives